nursery/apertium-udm-rus/apertium-udm-rus.udm.twol
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж Ӝ З Ӟ И Ӥ Й К Л М Н О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ӵ Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я  
 а б в г д е ё ж ӝ з ӟ и ӥ й к л м н о ӧ п р с т у ф х ц ч ӵ ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я 

 %>:0 %{j%}:ъ %{E%}:е %{I%}:и %{t%}:т %{s%}:с;

Sets

Glasnye = а е ё и ӥ о ӧ у ы э ю я ;

Soglasnye = б в г д ж ӝ з ӟ й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ӵ ;

Zvonkie = а е ё и ӥ о ӧ у ы э ю я б г д ж ӝ з ӟ й л м н р ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Archiphoneme E"
%{E%}:э <=> [ д | з | л | н | с | т | у ] %>: _ ;

"Archiphoneme I"
%{I%}:ӥ <=> [ д | з | л | н | с | т | у ] %>: _ ;

"Delete soft sign"
ь:0 <=> _ %>: [ :Glasnye | :Soglasnye ] ;

"Delete short i"
й:0 <=> _ %>: %{E%}: ;

"jo after cons"
о:ё <=> :Soglasnye %>: %{j%}: _ ;

"hard sign before jotated plural"
%{j%}:ъ <=> :Soglasnye %>: _ ;


"after vowel"
%{j%}:0 <=> :Glasnye %>: _ ;

"t/d after zvonkie"
%{t%}:д <=> :Zvonkie %>: _ ;

"s/z after zvonkie"
%{s%}:з <=> :Zvonkie %>: _ ;
